Georgia, session 2025_26, HB535.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 42-8-38 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to arrest or
graduated sanctions for probationers violating terms, hearing, disposition of charge, and
procedure when probation revoked in county other than that of conviction, is amended by
revising subsection (c) as follows:
"(c) After the hearing, the court may revoke, modify, or continue the probation. If the
probation is revoked, the court may order the execution of the sentence originally imposed
or of any portion thereof. In such event, the time that the defendant has served under
probation shall be considered as time served and shall be deducted from and considered a
part of the time he or she was originally sentenced to serve. Regarding any carceral
H. B. 535
- 1 -

LC 48 1478
sentence imposed pursuant to a revocation of probation, a person shall be given full credit
for time served for each day served in confinement since the date of the commission of the
violation in accordance with Code Section 17-10-11, excluding any time tolled in
accordance with Code Section 42-8-36."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 535
- 2 -